Alaska, session 34, HB350.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 43.20 is amended by adding a new section to read: 05 Sec. 43.20.019. Tax on income attributable to a qualified entity. (a) If a 06 qualified entity has taxable income over $25,000,000 in a tax year, the qualified entity 07 shall pay a tax of 9.4 percent on the taxable income over $25,000,000. 08 (b) For purposes of calculating taxable income under this section, 09 (1) taxable income of a qualified entity is determined under 10 AS 43.20.144 as if the qualified entity were taxable as a C corporation, as defined by 11 26 U.S.C. 1361(a)(2) (Internal Revenue Code), as that section read on January 1, 12 2026; 13 (2) notwithstanding AS 43.20.021 and AS 43.20.036, the taxpayer may 14 not apply as a credit or deduction against tax liability a credit or deduction allowed as 01 to federal taxes under 26 U.S.C. (Internal Revenue Code), except that the taxpayer 02 may take a credit or deduction allowed for a C corporation under (1) of this 03 subsection. 04 (c) The tax under this section does not apply to a corporation subject to tax 05 under AS 43.20.011 or to an entity that is part of a unitary business with a corporation 06 subject to tax under AS 43.20.011. 07 (d) For the purpose of determining the tax due under this section, the 08 department shall 09 (1) aggregate the taxable income of two or more entities if the 10 department determines that, without the provisions of this section, the taxable income 11 would reasonably be expected to be attributed to a single entity; and 12 (2) except as provided in (c) of this section, include in the calculation 13 of taxable income of the qualified entity income that is attributable to an entity that is 14 part of a unitary business with the qualified entity paying tax under this section. 15 (e) In this section, "qualified entity" means a 16 (1) sole proprietorship; 17 (2) partnership; 18 (3) limited liability company; or 19 (4) entity that has elected to file federal returns under 26 U.S.C. 1361 - 20 1379 (Internal Revenue Code). 21 * Sec. 2. AS 43.20.030(a) is amended to read: 22 (a) If a taxpayer [CORPORATION], or a partnership that has a taxpayer 23 [CORPORATION] as a partner, is required to make a return under the provisions of 24 the Internal Revenue Code, the taxpayer [IT] shall file with the department, within 30 25 days after the federal return is required to be filed, a return setting out 26 (1) the amount of tax due under this chapter, less credits claimed 27 against the tax; and 28 (2) other information for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of 29 this chapter that the department requires. 30 * Sec. 3. AS 43.20.031(i) is amended to read: 31 (i) A taxpayer that [CORPORATION WHICH] is a member of a group of 01 unitary corporations or entities that [WHICH] collectively has income from business 02 activity taxable both inside and outside the state, or income from other sources both 03 inside and outside the state, shall determine its income from sources in this state by 04 use of the combined method of accounting. 05 * Sec. 4. AS 43.20.031 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 06 (j) For purposes of calculating income under this chapter, a taxpayer may 07 deduct from income a payment to the shareholder, owner, member, or partner of a 08 qualified entity, as that term is defined in AS 43.20.019(e), if 09 (1) the shareholder, owner, member, or partner is a taxpayer under this 10 chapter; 11 (2) the payment does not include a transfer of property; and 12 (3) the payment is included in the shareholder's, owner's, member's, or 13 partner's income for the purposes of this chapter. 14 * Sec. 5. AS 43.05.085; AS 43.20.012(b), and 43.20.013 are repealed. 15 * Sec. 6. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 16 read: 17 APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to a qualified entity with taxable income over 18 $25,000,000 for a tax year beginning on or after January 1, 2026. In this section, "qualified 19 entity" has the meaning given in AS 43.20.019(e). 20 * Sec. 7. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 21 read: 22 TRANSITION: PAYMENT OF TAX. A person subject to tax before the effective 23 date of this Act under AS 43.20.019, added by sec. 1 of this Act, shall pay the balance of the 24 tax due for a tax year ending before January 1, 2027, by January 1, 2027. Until January 1, 25 2027, the Department of Revenue shall waive interest that would otherwise accrue under 26 AS 43.05.225 and civil and criminal penalties accruing under AS 43.05.220, 43.05.245, and 27 43.05.290 that are a result of the retroactivity of this Act. 28 * Sec. 8. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 29 read: 30 RETROACTIVITY OF REGULATIONS. Notwithstanding a contrary provision of 31 AS 44.62.240, if the Department of Revenue expressly designates in the regulation that the 01 regulation applies retroactively to a specific date, a regulation adopted by the department to 02 implement, interpret, make specific, or otherwise carry out this Act applies retroactively to 03 that date. 04 * Sec. 9. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 05 read: 06 RETROACTIVITY. This Act is retroactive to January 1, 2026. 07 * Sec. 10. This Act takes effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.